Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1922
Denial of license; disciplinary action; notice; final; when.

(1) If the department determines to deny the issuance of or take disciplinary action against a license under the Child Care Licensing Act, the department shall send to the applicant or licensee, by certified mail to the address of the applicant or licensee, a notice setting forth the determination, the particular reasons for the determination, including a specific description of the nature of the violation and the statute, rule, regulation, or order violated, and the type of disciplinary action which is pending. A copy of the notice shall also be mailed to the person in charge of the program if the licensee is not actually involved in the daily operation of the program. If the licensee is a corporation, a copy of the notice shall be sent to the corporation's registered agent.

(2) The denial or disciplinary action shall become final fifteen days after the mailing of the notice unless the applicant or licensee, within such fifteen-day period, makes a written request for a hearing. The license shall continue in effect until the final order of the department if a hearing is requested. If the department does not receive such request within such fifteen-day period, the action of the department shall be final.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 85;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 506.